Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB997.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 7804(a) introductory paragraph and (7) introductory paragraph of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and subsection (a)(7) is amended by adding a subparagraph to read:§ 7804. Motor Carrier Safety Advisory Committee.(a) Creation.--There is hereby created a Motor Carrier Safety Advisory Committee which shall consist of the following [31] members:* * *(7) [Twenty-three] Twenty-four TWENTY-FIVE members of the public representing the areas of concern specified who shall have extensive experience and knowledge of motor carrier transportation and safety activities throughout this Commonwealth, to be appointed by the Governor as follows:<--12345678910111213141516171819 * * *(xx) One member of the Pennsylvania Online Messengers Association Board of Directors.(XXI) ONE MEMBER OF THE HIGHLY AUTOMATED VEHICLE TRUCKING INDUSTRY.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0997PN1271 - 2 - <--1234567